Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB129.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CLAUSE to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) Using a form or other document related to a consumer transaction that contains an automatic renewal provision or a <--12345678910111213141516171819 provision creating any other form of negative option plan. For purposes of this subclause, the following shall apply: (A) The term "negative option plan" means a transaction that involves a seller and a consumer and includes the sending of goods or performance of services not actually ordered or requested by the consumer or that the consumer must opt out from ordering or receiving, unless:(A) THE TERM "NEGATIVE OPTION PLAN" MEANS AN AGREEMENT IN WHICH THE CONSUMER'S SILENCE OR FAILURE TO TAKE AFFIRMATIVE ACTION TO REJECT A GOOD OR SERVICE OR TO CANCEL THE AGREEMENT IS INTERPRETED BY THE NEGATIVE OPTION SELLER AS ACCEPTANCE OR CONTINUING ACCEPTANCE OF THE OFFER, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, AN AUTOMATIC RENEWAL, A CONTINUITY PLAN, A FREE-TO-PAY CONVERSION OR FEE-TO-PAY CONVERSION OR A PRE-NOTIFICATION NEGATIVE OPTION PLAN, UNLESS:(I) The provision regarding the transaction is specified in a clear and conspicuous manner , is in at least twelve-point type, is boldfaced and includes all of the following: (a) The specific procedure by which the consumer may cancel at the end of the initial term and the terms of the automatic renewal.(b) (A) An acknowledgment that includes the automatic renewal offer terms and information regarding how to THE SPECIFIC PROCEDURE BY WHICH THE CONSUMER MAY cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.(c) (B) A guarantee that the seller will notify the consumer before the automatic renewal occurs:(i) Not more than fifteen days before a renewal period of less than three months.(ii) Not more than thirty days before a renewal period of 20250HB0129PN1875 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 three months or more.(iii) Using means of communication chosen by the consumer. (II) The renewal period does not exceed twelve months. BY WHICH THE CONSUMER COMMONLY INTERACTS WITH THE BUSINESS.(III) (II) If the offer includes a free, discounted or otherwise different introductory trial, all of the following apply:(a) The seller discloses in the acknowledgment required under subunit (I)(b) (I)(A) how to cancel and allow the consumer to cancel before the consumer pays the full amount for the goods or services.(b) At the initiation of an introductory trial period, the seller discloses a description of all charges that will be imposed after the introductory trial period ends, including whether billing will include charges for shipping and handling and the amount of the shipping and handling charges.(IV) (III) The means MECHANISMS of cancellation available to the consumer are identical to the means MECHANISMS by which the consumer may agree to the provision.(V) (IV) The seller does not make or submit a charge to the consumer's credit card, debit card, bank account, account with a third party or other financial account, unless the seller has complied with the requirements of this subclause and obtained the consumer's affirmative consent to the agreement containing the terms of the automatic renewal. As used in this subunit , the term "affirmative consent":(a) Means a clear, affirmative act signifying the consumer's freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous agreement to the automatic renewal or continuous service terms.(b) Includes a written statement, including a statement 20250HB0129PN1875 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 written by electronic means, or an unambiguous affirmative action.(B) This subclause shall not apply to any of the following:(I) A business entity that is subject to the act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the "Health Club Act."(II) A service provided by a business entity or its affiliate in accordance with a franchise issued by a political subdivision.(III) A service provided by a business entity or its affiliate for which the business entity or its affiliate is regulated by the Federal Communications Commission, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(IV) A business-to-business or business-to-government enterprise for products or software.(V) An entity regulated by the Insurance Department.(VI) A contract subject to 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 22 (relating to natural gas competition) or 28 (relating to restructuring of electric utility industry).(VII) SERVICES FOR THE INSTALLATION, SERVICE, INSPECTION, TESTING, MAINTENANCE OR MONITORING OF A SECURITY SYSTEM. AS USED IN THIS SUBUNIT, THE TERM "SECURITY SYSTEM" MEANS AN ASSEMBLY OF ELECTRONIC EQUIPMENT AND DEVICES THAT PROVIDES, AS ITS MAIN PURPOSE, THE PROTECTION OF LIFE OR PROPERTY AND THE DETECTION OF THREATS OR VIOLATIONS TO THE SECURITY OF THE PROTECTED PREMISES. THE SYSTEMS FUNCTIONS INCLUDE, SOLELY OR IN COMBINATION: BURGLAR ALARM SYSTEMS, FIRE ALARM AND SPRINKLER SYSTEMS, ELECTRONIC ACCESS CONTROL SYSTEMS, VIDEO SURVEILLANCE SYSTEMS OR PERSONAL EMERGENCY RESPONSE SYSTEMS.* * *20250HB0129PN1875 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) "CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS" MEANS, IN REFERENCE TO TEXT, TYPE LARGER THAN THE SURROUNDING TEXT, OR IN CONTRASTING TYPE, FONT, OR COLOR TO THE SURROUNDING TEXT OF THE SAME SIZE, OR SET OFF FROM THE SURROUNDING TEXT OF THE SAME SIZE BY SYMBOLS OR OTHER MARKS, IN A MANNER THAT CLEARLY CALLS ATTENTION TO THE LANGUAGE.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0129PN1875 - 5 - 12345678